Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Regulation of Transportation Fares

§ 21-27-121.
General grant of authority.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to fix the rates and charges of persons operating vehicles for the transportation of persons for compensation within the limits of the municipality. The authority granted by this section shall not apply, however, to railroads operated within or through such municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2960; 1906, § 3356; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5853; 1930, § 2433; 1942, § 3374-143; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 143, eff from and after July 1, 1950.